District of Columbia statutes.
31-3863

Medicaid reimbursement.

Medicaid shall cover and reimburse for healthcare services appropriately delivered through telehealth if the same services would be covered when delivered in person.

Oct. 17, 2013, D.C. Law 20-26, § 4, 60 DCR 11117